Utah statutes.
58-17b-614.   Notification.

(1)  A pharmacy shall report in writing to the division not later than 10 business days before the date of:

(a)  a permanent closure of the pharmacy facility;

(b)  a change of name or ownership of the pharmacy facility;

(c)  a change of location of the pharmacy facility;

(d)  a sale or transfer of any controlled substance as a result of the permanent closing or change of ownership of the pharmacy facility;

(e)  any matter or occurrence that the board requires by rule to be reported;

(f)  a final administrative disciplinary order against the pharmacy license holder by the regulatory or licensing agency of the state in which the pharmacy is located if the pharmacy is a class D pharmacy; or

(g)  a final order against a pharmacist who is designated as the pharmacist-in-charge of the pharmacy by the regulatory or licensing agency of the state in which the pharmacy is located if the pharmacy is a class D pharmacy.

(2)  A pharmacy shall report in writing to the division a disaster, accident, or emergency that may affect the purity or labeling of a drug, medication, device, or other material used in the diagnosis or treatment of injury, illness, or disease immediately upon the occurrence of the disaster, accident, or emergency as defined by rule. 

(3)  A reporting pharmacy shall maintain a copy of any notification required by this section for two years and make a copy available for inspection.



Amended by Chapter 279, 2007 General Session

